Nebraska, session 109, LB454.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-809 (1) Each regional behavioral health authority shall be responsible
for the development and coordination of publicly funded behavioral health
services within the behavioral health region pursuant to rules and regulations
adopted and promulgated by the department, including, but not limited to, (a)
administration and management of the regional behavioral health authority, (b)
integration and coordination of the public behavioral health system within the
behavioral health region, (c) comprehensive planning for the provision of an
appropriate array of community-based behavioral health services and continuum
of care for the region, (d) submission for approval by the division of an
annual budget and a proposed plan for the funding and administration of
publicly funded behavioral health services within the region, (e) submission of
annual reports and other reports as required by the division, (f) initiation
and oversight of contracts for the provision of publicly funded behavioral
health services, and (g) coordination with the division in conducting audits of
publicly funded behavioral health programs and services.
(2) Each regional behavioral health authority shall adopt a policy for use
in determining the financial eligibility of all consumers and shall adopt a
uniform schedule of fees and copays, based on the policy and schedule developed
by the division, to be assessed against consumers utilizing community-based
behavioral health services in the region. The methods used to determine the
financial eligibility of all consumers shall take into account taxable income,
the number of family members dependent on the consumer's income, liabilities,
and other factors as determined by the division. The policy and the schedule of
fees and copays shall be approved by the regional governing board and included
with the budget plan submitted to the division annually. Providers shall charge
fees consistent with the schedule of fees and copays in accordance with the
financial eligibility of all consumers but not in excess of the actual cost of
the service. Each regional behavioral health authority shall assure that its
policy and schedule of fees and copays are applied uniformly by the providers
in the region.
(3) Except for services being provided by a regional behavioral health
authority on July 1, 2004, under applicable state law in effect prior to such
date, no regional behavioral health authority shall provide behavioral health
services funded in whole or in part with revenue received and administered by
the division under the Nebraska Behavioral Health Services Act unless:
(a) There has been a public competitive bidding process for such services
or the process is authorized pursuant to subsection (5) of this section;
(b) There are no qualified and willing providers to provide such services;
and
(c) The regional behavioral health authority receives written
authorization from the director and enters into a contract with the division to
provide such services.
(4) Each regional behavioral health authority shall comply with all
applicable rules and regulations of the department relating to the provision of
behavioral health services by such authority, including, but not limited to,
rules and regulations which (a) establish definitions of conflicts of interest
for regional behavioral health authorities and procedures in the event such
conflicts arise, (b) establish uniform and equitable public bidding procedures
for such services, and (c) require each regional behavioral health authority to
establish and maintain a separate budget and separately account for all revenue
and expenditures for the provision of such services.
(5) A behavioral health services provider may, with approval by the
department, provide new behavioral health services or expand the capacity of
existing services if the provider (a) meets the department's required network
enrollment standards, (b) is enrolled as a network provider with the department
and a regional behavioral health authority, and (c) is contracted with a
regional behavioral health authority.
Sec. 2. Section 71-812, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-812 (1) The Behavioral Health Services Fund is created. The fund shall
be administered by the division and shall contain cash funds appropriated by
the Legislature or otherwise received by the department for the provision of
behavioral health services from any other public or private source and directed
by the Legislature for credit to the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund
-1-

LB454 LB454
2025 2025
to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
(2) The Behavioral Health Services Fund shall be used to encourage and
facilitate the statewide development and provision of community-based
behavioral health services, including, but not limited to, (a) the provision of
grants, loans, and other assistance for such purpose and (b) reimbursement to
providers of such services.
(3)(a) Money transferred to the fund under section 76-903 shall be used
for housing-related assistance for very low-income adults with serious mental
illness or substance abuse disorder, except that if the division determines
that all housing-related assistance obligations under this subsection have been
fully satisfied, the division may distribute any excess, up to twenty percent
of such money, to regional behavioral health authorities for acquisition or
rehabilitation of housing to assist such persons. The division shall manage and
distribute such funds based upon a formula established by the division, in
consultation with regional behavioral health authorities and the department, in
a manner consistent with and reasonably calculated to promote the purposes of
the public behavioral health system enumerated in section 71-803. The division
shall contract with each regional behavioral health authority for the provision
of such assistance. Each regional behavioral health authority may contract with
qualifying public, private, or nonprofit entities for the provision of such
assistance.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Adult with serious mental illness means a person eighteen years of age
or older who has, or at any time during the immediately preceding twelve months
has had, a diagnosable mental, behavioral, or emotional disorder of sufficient
duration to meet diagnostic criteria identified in the most recent edition of
the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and which has
resulted in functional impairment that substantially interferes with or limits
one or more major life functions. Serious mental illness does not include DSM V
codes, substance abuse disorders, or developmental disabilities unless such
conditions exist concurrently with a diagnosable serious mental illness;
(ii) Housing-related assistance includes rental payments, utility
payments, security and utility deposits, landlord risk mitigation payments, and
other related costs and payments;
(iii) Landlord risk mitigation payment means a payment provided to a
landlord who leases or rents property to a very low-income adult with serious
mental illness which may be used to pay for excessive damage to the rental
property, any lost rent, any legal fees incurred by the landlord in excess of
the security deposit, or any other expenses incurred by the landlord as a
result of leasing or renting the property to such individual; and
(iv) Very low-income means a household income of fifty percent or less of
the applicable median family income estimate as established by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(4) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 71-809, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 71-812, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-2-